Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.076

Amendment to certificate of formation.

(1) A certificate of formation is amended by delivering a certificate of amendment to the secretary of state for filing. The certificate of amendment shall set forth:

(a) The name of the limited liability company; and

(b) The amendment to the certificate of formation.

(2) A manager or, if there is no manager, then any member who becomes aware that any statement in a certificate of formation was false when made, or that any matter described has changed making the certificate of formation false in any material respect, must promptly amend the certificate of formation.

(3) A certificate of formation may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose.

(4) Unless a delayed effective date is provided for in the certificate of amendment in accordance with RCW 23.95.210, a certificate of amendment is effective when filed by the secretary of state as provided in RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7107; 2015 c 188 s 19.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.